Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-972.01
School Retirement Fund; created; use.

The School Retirement Fund is created. The required deposits of an employer, the state, and the employees shall be credited to the fund and all savings annuities, service annuities, and formula annuities shall be paid from the fund as provided in the School Employees Retirement Act. Subfunds may be established as necessary. Any unexpended balance existing on June 30, 2002, in the School Employers Deposit Account, the Service Annuity Account, the School Employees Savings Account, the Annuity Reserve Account, and the School Employees Retirement System Reserve Fund shall be transferred to the School Retirement Fund.

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 42;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 6.